California, session 20252026, SB398.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18107.5 is added to the Elections Code, to read:18107.5. (a) (1) A person who knowingly or willfully pays or offers to pay money or other valuable consideration to another person with the intent to induce the person to vote or to register to vote, or where the payment is contingent upon whether the person voted or the person’s voter registration status, is guilty of a crime.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “other valuable consideration” includes, but is not limited to, a chance to win a lottery or similar prize-drawing contest.(3) This section does not apply to any of the following:(A) Transportation to or from a voting location.(B) Compensation provided to an individual by a governmental entity.(C) Granting time off to an employee to vote.(b) A violation of subdivision (a) shall be punishable by a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16 months or two or three years, or in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.